Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Penalties

273.990.
Penalties.

If any board of directors or trustees fails to make the report required by KRS

273.150

, each director or trustee shall be fined ten dollars ($10) for each day until the report is made.

Any director or trustee of any incorporated cemetery or burying ground organized for private profit who is convicted of violating any provisions of its charter or any statute relating to cemeteries or burying grounds shall be removed from that position.

Any superintendent of any incorporated cemetery or burying ground who violates its charter shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) and removed from that position.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 141, § 5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Tobergte, Regulating the Nonprofit Corporation, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 325 (1989).

273.991.
Additional penalties for violation of KRS 506.010, 506.030, 506.040, 521.020, or 521.050.

If a domestic nonprofit corporation is convicted of a violation of KRS

506.010

,

506.030

,

506.040

,

521.020

, or

521.050

, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation violates any of those sections under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the charter of the nonprofit corporation be suspended for a period of not more than five (5) years for a first offense, ten (10) years for a second offense, and permanently for a third or subsequent offense.

If a foreign nonprofit corporation is convicted of violating any section specified in subsection (1) of this section, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation violates any of those sections under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the nonprofit corporation not be permitted to do business in Kentucky for the appropriate period specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The penalties specified in this section shall be in addition to any other penalty specified by law for the commission of the offenses listed in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 477, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.